apertium-tki.tki.lexc
LEXICON V-IV
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON ;

%<v%>%<iv%>%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{%L%} V-DERIV ;

LEXICON V-TV 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ;

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{%L%} V-DERIV ;




!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


LEXICON PRON-ITG 
کیم:کیم PRON-ITG-INFL ;
بیربیری:بیربیری PRON-RECIP ;
کیم% کیمه:کیم% کیمه PRON-ITG-INFL ;
نه:نه PRON-ITG-INFL ;
نیی:نیی PRON-ITG-INFL ;
نیچن:نیجن PRON-ITG-INFL ;
هاسی:هاسی PRON-ITG-INFL ;
ناخسی:ناخسی PRON-ITG-INFL ;
نادی:نادی PRON-ITG-INFL ;
هاردا:هاردا PRON-ITG-INFL ;
نانجا:نانجا PRON-ITG-INFL ;
هانی:هانی PRON-ITG-INFL ;
هرا:هرا PRON-ITG-INFL ;
نیی:نیی PRON-ITG-INFL ;
هرناخسی:هرناخسی PRON-ITG-INFL ;
ناخسی:ناخسی PRON-ITG-INFL ;


LEXICON Interjections
یو:یو INTERJ ;
فلان:فلان INTERJ ;
فلان% فستان:فلان% فستان INTERJ ;
أی:أی INTERJ ;
إه:إه INTERJ ;
هه:هه INTERJ ;
يو:يو INTERJ ;
مرحبا:مرحبا INTERJ ;
إنشالله:إنشالله INTERJ ;
پکی:پکی INTERJ ;
مسله:مسله INTERJ ;
عجبا:عجبا INTERJ ;
هادی:هادی INTERJ ;
وای:وای INTERJ ;
آه:آه INTERJ ;
تمام:تمام INTERJ ;
یو:یو INTERJ ;
يعنی:يعنی INTERJ ;
یوخ:یوخ INTERJ ;
هە:هە INTERJ ;


LEXICON Pronouns 

اوزو:اوزو PRON-PERS-OZ ;
أوز:أوز PRON-REF ;
بورا:بورا PRON-ADV ;
اورا:اورا PRON-ADV ;
من:من PRON-PERS-MAN ;
سن:سن PRON-PERS-SEN ;
بیز:بیز PRON-PERS-BIZ ;
سیز:سیز PRON-PERS-SIZ ;
اولار:اولار PRON-PERS-OLAR ;
او:او PRON-PERS-O ;
هامسی:هامسی PRON-QNT ;
هر% شی:هر% شی PRON-QNT ;
هیچ:هیچ PRON-QNT ;
کیمسه:کیمسه PRON-QNT ;
چوخو:چوخو PRON-QNT ;
هیچ% بیر:هیچ% بیر PRON-QNT ;
هر% بیر:هر% بیر PRON-QNT ;
هرکش:هرکش PRON-QNT ;
بیر:بیر PRON-PERS-O ;
أیکیسی:أیکیسی PRON-PERS-O ;
بیربیر:بیربیر PRON-PERS-BIZ ;
بو:بو PRON-DEM-BU ;
هیچ% بیر% شی:هیچ% بیر% شی PRON-PERS-MAN ;
إیکی:إیکی PRON-QNT ;
هیچ:هیچ PRON-QNT ;
بیزی:بیزی PRON-PERS-O ;
بیری:بیری PRON-IND ;
هپ:هپ PRON-QNT ;
هیچبیر% شی:هیچبیر% شی PRON-NEG ;
هیچبیر:هیجبیر PRON-QNT ;
بیرسی:بیرسی PRON-QNT ;
بیرسی:بیرسی PRON-PERS-O ;
بیربیر:بیربیر PRON-PERS-O ;
بعزلاری:بعزلاری PRON-QNT ;
بعزی:بعزی PRON-QNT ;
هرکش:هرکش PRON-QNT ;
کیم:کیم PRON-ITG ;
ندی:ندی PRON-ITG ;
هپسی:هپسی PRON-QNT ;
هپسی:هپسی DET-QNT ;
بیربیری:بیربیری PRON-RECIP ;
PRON-ITG ;




LEXICON Numerals

سفر:سفر NUM ;
بير:بير NUM ;
إیكی:إیكی NUM ;
أوچ:أوچ NUM ;
دورت:دورت NUM ; 
بیش:بیش NUM ;
التی:التی NUM ;
یدی:یدی NUM ;	
سكیز:سكیز NUM ;
دوقوز:دوقوز NUM ;
اون:اون NUM ;
ایگرمی:ایگرمی NUM ;
اوتوز:اوتوز NUM ;
قی:قیرخ NUM ;
اللی:اللی NUM ;
التمش:التمش NUM ;
یتمیش:یتمیش NUM ;
سكسن:سكسن NUM ; 
دوخسان:دوخسان NUM ;
یوز:یوز NUM ;
بیین:بیین NUM ;
ملیون:ملیون NUM ; 
ملیار:ملیار NUM ;	
تیریلیون:تیریلیون NUM ;
بوچوغ:بوچوغ NUM ; 

I:I NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
II:II NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
III:III NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
IV:IV NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
IX:IX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
V:V NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VI:VI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VII:VII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VIII:VIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
X:X NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XI:XI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XII:XII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIII:XIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIV:XIV NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIX:XIX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XV:XV NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVI:XVI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVII:XVII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVIII:XVIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XX:XX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XXI:XXI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XXII:XXII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
 





LEXICON Abbreviations
کم:کم ABBR ;
سم:سم ABBR ;
پروف:پروف ABBR ;
م:م ABBR ;
کغم:کغم ABBR ;
غرام:غرام ABBR ;
قم:قم ABBR ;
بم:بم ABBR ;
د%.:د%. ABBR ;
م%.:م%. ABBR ;
ا%.:ا%. ABBR ;
إ%.:إ%. ABBR ;
ب%.:ب%. ABBR ;
س%.:س%: ABBR ;
چ%.:چ%. ABBR ;
ج%.:ج%. ABBR ;	
د%.:د%. ABBR ;
ی%.:ی%. ABBR ;
پ%.:پ%. ABBR ;


X:X NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""





LEXICON LASTDIGIT

۱:۱%{ь%}%{b%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "bir"
۲:۲%{ь%}                NUM-DIGIT ; ! "iki"
۳:۳%{ö%}%{p%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "üç"
۴:۴%{ö%}%{p%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "dört"
۵:۵%{ь%}%{p%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "beş"
٦:٦%{ı%}                NUM-DIGIT ; ! "altı"
۷:۷%{ь%}                NUM-DIGIT ; ! "yedi"
۸:۸%{ь%}%{b%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "sekiz"
۹:۹%{o%}%{b%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "dokuz"

LEXICON Punctuation

.%<sent%>:. # ;
..%<sent%>:.. # ;
...%<sent%>:... # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%؛%<sent%>:%؛ # ; 
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%،%<cm%>:%، # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%--%<guio%>:%-- # ;
%---%<guio%>:%--- # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
%–%<guio%>:%– # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%؟%<sent%>:%؟ # ;
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
%"%<sent%>:%" # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
%\%<sent%>:%\ # ;
%/%<sent%>:%/ # ;

%【:%【%<lpar%> # ;
%】:%】%<rpar%> # ;
（:（%<lpar%> # ;
）:）%<rpar%> # ;
‹‹%<lquot%>:‹‹ # ;
››%<rquot%>:›› # ;
《%<lquot%>:《 # ;
》%<rquot%>:》 # ;
‹%<lquot%>:‹ # ;
›%<rquot%>:› # ;
，%<cm%>:， # ;
、%<cm%>:、 # ;
：:：%<sent%> # ;
。:。%<sent%> # ;
？:？%<sent%> # ;
！:！%<sent%> # ;

LEXICON Digits
%0:%0 NUM ;  ! Use/Circ
LASTDIGIT ;

!<[%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+>  DIGITLEX ; ! Use/Circ

!LEXICON DIGITLEX


!%<num%>: # ; 
!%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST-2 ;

!LEXICON BARB

!%<barb%>: # ;




! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! http://www.cis.upenn.edu/~cis639/docs/lexc.html
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst

LEXICON Verbs
قابول% أت:قابول% أ V-TV ;
پایلاش:پایلاش V-TV ;
گوروش:گوروش V-IV ;
ارتر:ارتر V-TV ;
تماملا:تماملا V-TV ;
مناقشه% ات:مناقشه% ات V-TV ;
إیتیر:إیتیر V-TV ;
دولدور:دولدور V-TV ;
أوگرن:أوگرن V-TV ;
دوشون:دوشون V-TV ;
خالص% اول:خالص% اول V-IV ;
اوی:اوی V-IV ;
إیستە:إیستە V-TV ;
جوش:جوش V-IV ;
قیز:قیز V-IV ;
دیله:دیله V-TV ;
داین:داین V-IV ;
إیلارلە:إیلارلە V-IV ;
ایشلە:ایشلە V-IV ;
کسیش:کسیش V-IV ;
یارات:یارات V-TV ;
إیرت% أت:أیرت% أت V-TV ;
توتوکلا:توتوکلا V-IV ;
قارش:قارش V-IV ;
أوزن:أوزن V-IV ;
اوزان:اوزان V-IV ;
قورو:قورو V-IV ;
تطبیق% ات:تطبیق% ات V-TV ;
اغر:اغر V-IV ;
هدفلە:هدفله V-TV ;
یوجل:یوجل V-IV ;
گلیش:گلیش V-IV ;
یوکلن:یوکلن V-IV ;
بولون:بولون V-IV ;
کورک:کورک V-IV ;
أول:أول V-IV ;
أکله:أکله V-TV ;
جزلاندر:جزلاندر V-TV ;
بارش:بارش V-IV ;
اتئل:اتئل V-IV ;
یوکسل: یوکسل V-IV ;
أر:أر V-IV ;
اولاش:اولاش V-IV ;
بکله:بکله V-TV ;
یاشا:یاشا V-TV ;
إشلن:إشلن V-IV ;
چخار:چخار V-TV ;
دەگیشتیر:دەگیشتیر V-TV ;
دون:دون V-IV ;
ایرل:ایرل V-IV ;
سون:سون V-TV ;
دور:دور V-IV ;
دیرلندیر:دیرلندیر V-TV ;
گیون:گیون V-IV ;
أویان:أویان V-IV ;
یاپ:یاپ V-TV ;
مشغول% اول:مشغول% اول V-IV ;
يات:يات V-IV ;
یوروت:یوروت V-TV ;
دوش:دوش V-IV ;
دییل:دییل V-IV ;
سورو:سورو V-TV ;
اجی:اجی V-IV ;
انلاش:انلاش V-IV ;
سول:سول V-IV ;
یغش:یغش V-IV ;
قارا:قارا V-IV ;
حمایە% ات:حمایە% ات V-TV ;
گچ:گچ V-IV ;
قوی:قوی V-TV ;
إنجلە:إنجلە V-IV ;
تنزیم% ات:تنزیم% ات V-IV ;
یان:یان V-IV ;
گرک:گرک V-IV ;
ساغلا:ساغلا V-IV ;
قال:قال V-IV ;
گچیر:كچیر V-IV ;
گچیرل:گچیرل V-TV ;
إن:إن V-IV ;
چخ:چخ V-IV ;
دە:ده V-TV ;
سیو:سیو V-TV ;
حازرلا:حازرلا V-TV ;
گرچکلە:گرچکلە V-IV ;
گرچکلهش:گرچکلش V-IV ;
مشارکە% ات:مشارکە% ات V-IV ;
إیچ:إیچ V-TV ;
گید:گید V-IV ;
گورون:گورون V-IV ;
إیسته:إیسته V-TV ;
اوینا:اوینا V-TV ;
اوینا:اوینا V-IV ;
گول:گول V-IV ;
قاچ:قاچ V-IV ;
وار:وار V-IV ;
ساخلان:ساخلان V-IV ;
قاخ:قاخ V-IV ;
اوتو:اوتو V-IV ;
گل:گل V-IV ;
سلاملا:سلاملا V-TV ;
أوتور:أوتور V-IV ;
باخ:باخ V-IV ;
قوخلا:قوخلا V-TV ;
سیل:سیل V-TV ;
مکله:مکله V-IV ;
أسیر% دوش:أسیر% دوش V-IV ;
رام% ات:رام% ات V-TV ;
گیت:گی{T} V-IV ; ! "go"
إدیل:إدیل V-IV ;
حساب% صور:حساب% صور V-IV ;
حمد% ئت:حمد% ئت V-IV ;
إیمان% ئت:إیمان% ئت V-IV ;
تشکور% ئت:تشکور% ئت V-IV ;
دیقات% ئت:دیقات% ئت V-IV ;
بیربیریزله% گیت:بیربیریزله% گیت V-IV ;
تعریف% ئت:تعریف% ئت V-TV ;
إعلان% ئت:إعلان% ئت V-TV ;
عزیت% ئت:عزیت% ئت V-IV ;
ناماز% قیل:ناماز% قیل V-IV ;
دیریلت:دیریلت V-TV ;
تعین% ئت:تعین% ئت V-TV ;
اچغ:اچغ V-IV ;
اوچورت:اوچورت V-TV ;
أریت:أریت V-TV ;
باشلا:باشلا V-IV ;
ئنکار% ئت:ئنکار% ئت V-TV ;
خبر% صال :خبر% صال V-IV ;
یاواش:یاواش V-IV ;
سوت% ور:سوت% ور V-IV ;
پیشمان% اول:پیشمان% اول V-IV ;
خیال% ئت:خیال% ئت V-TV ;
فازلای% چخ:فازلای% چخ V-IV ;
باتر:باتر V-TV ;
أحترام% ئت:أحترام% ئت V-IV ;
گورله:گورله V-IV ;
خوطه% قور:خوطه% قور V-IV ;
بله% إله:بله% إله V-IV ;
اغارت:اغارت V-TV ;
ادمله:ادمله V-IV ;
تورشو:تورشو V-IV ;
بیشیر:بیشیر V-TV ;
سخشتیر:سخشتیر V-TV ;
بیتیر:بیتیر V-TV ;
گور:گور V-IV ;
چئلدر:چئلدر V-TV ;
خوروزلان:خوروزلان V-IV ;
نازلان:نازلان V-IV ;
قورخ:قورخ V-IV ;
سسلن:سسلن V-IV ;
اوزغلاش:اوزغلاش V-IV ;
یاخنلاش:یاخنلاش V-IV ;
ال:ال V-TV ;
کس:کس V-TV ;
قاپ:قاپ V-TV ;
بیل:بیل V-TV ;
بیت:بیت V-IV ;
کشفت:کشفت V-TV ;
قیل:قیل V-TV ;
أت:أت V-TV ;
قاو:قاو V-TV ;
قور:قور V-TV ;
إستخدام% إت:إستخدام% إت V-TV ;
الئش:الئش V-TV ;
أوپ:أوپ V-TV ;
أورت:أورت V-TV ;
صال:صال V-TV ;
سات:سات V-TV ;
سای:سای V-TV ;
کوپ:کوپ V-IV ;
سر:سر V-TV ;
سیخ:سیخ V-TV ;
سوك:سوك V-TV ;
سور:سور V-TV ;
تاراش% أت:تاراش% إت V-TV ;
توت:توت V-TV ;
اوت:اوت V-TV ;
چیم:چیم V-TV ;
یخ:یخ V-TV ;
یرت:یرت V-TV ;
یور:یور V-TV ;
یورول:یورول V-IV ;
گل:گل V-IV ;
اخ:اخ V-IV ;
یان:یان V-IV ;
چال:چال V-TV ;
دوش:دوش V-IV ;
اول:اول V-IV ;
ازلات:ازلات V-TV ;
قان:قان V-IV ;
دوزلت:دوزلت V-TV ;
ألگلی:ألگلی V-TV ;
إنان:إنان V-IV ;
إنان:إنان V-TV ;
قاندر:قاندر V-TV ;
هوالندر:هوالندر V-TV ;
تعیین% ات:تعیین% ات V-TV ;
تعمیر% أت:تعمیر% أت V-TV ;
رغبت% أت:رغبت% أت V-IV ;
گز:گز V-IV ;
بوروش:بوروش V-IV ;
بوزول:بوزول V-IV ;
چارپیل:چارپیل V-IV ;
دوشون:دوشون V-TV ;
گومول:گومول V-IV ;
باش% اگ:باش% اگ V-IV ;
حیساب% سور:حیساب% سور V-IV ;
أسیر% دوش:أسیر% دوش V-IV ;
حمد% أت:حمد% أت V-IV ;
إیمان% أت:إیمان% أت V-IV ;
تسویر% أت:تسویر% أت V-TV ;
عزیت% إت:عزیت% إت V-IV ;
أومید% أت:أومید% أت V-IV ;
ناماز% قیل:ناماز% قیل V-IV ;
ادملی:ادملی V-IV ;
ادم% آت:ادم% آت V-IV ;
تورش:تورش V-IV ;
خزمت% إت:خزمت% إت V-IV ;
شیشیر:شیشیر V-TV ;
مجبور% أول:مجبور% أول V-IV ;
بیتیر:بیتیر V-TV ;
بروشتور:بروشتور V-TV ;
ایچیر:ایچیر V-IV ;
اچل:اچل V-IV ;
چالدر:چالدر V-TV ;
اغرلاش:اغرلاش V-IV ;
خورزلان:خورزلان V-IV ;
گوچت:گوچت V-IV ;
پیلسن:پیلسن V-IV ;
نازلان:نازلان V-IV ;
قورخ:قورخ V-IV ;
سسلن:سسلن V-IV ;
اوزاغلاش:اوزاغلاش V-IV ;
یاخنلش:یاخنلش V-IV ;
قاپ:قاپ V-TV ;
قیل:قیل V-IV ;
قیرخ:قیرخ V-TV ;
قو:قو V-TV ;
قور:قور V-TV ;
لاغوت:لاغوت V-IV ;
ناقلت:ناقلت V-TV ;
اوپ:اوپ V-TV ;
أورت:أورت V-TV ;
رددت:رددت V-TV ;
سال:سال V-TV ;
سای:سای V-TV ;
سایلدی:سایلدی V-IV ;
سر:سر V-TV ;
سیو:سیو V-TV ;
سیخ:سیخ V-TV ;
سیلك:سیلك V-TV ;
سور:سور V-TV ;
سوی:سوی V-IV ;
تاك:تاك V-TV ;
ضاد:ضاد V-TV ;
تپ:تپ V-IV ;
ترکت:ترکت V-TV ;
تك:تك V-IV ;
توت:توت V-TV ;
اوت:اوت V-TV ;
أوزلە:أوزلە V-IV ;
یار:یار V-TV ;
یاز:یاز V-TV ;
یرت:یرت V-TV ;
یورول:یورول V-TV ;
یوز:ویز V-IV ;
اف% أت:اف% أت V-TV ;
عزمت:عزمت V-IV ;
الش:الش V-IV ;
اس:اس V-TV ;
باك:باك V-IV ;
بات:بات V-IV ;
بیچ:بیچ V-TV ;
بین:بین V-IV ;
بوغ:بوغ V-TV ;
تاپ:تاپ V-TV ;
بورچلان:بوررچلان V-IV ;
بوشالت:بوشالت V-TV ;
بوك:بوك V-TV ;
چال:چال V-TV ;
چات:چات V-TV ;
چویر:چویر V-TV ;
چرپ:چرپ V-TV ;
دکور% ات:دکور% ات V-IV ;
دانش:دانش V-IV ;
داگ:داگ V-IV ;
داگش:داگش V-IV ;
دال:دال V-TV ;
داوام% ات:داوام% ات V-IV ;
دوز:دوز V-TV ;
توك:توك V-TV ;
دوشون:دوشون V-TV ;
أیکت:إیکت V-IV ;
أم:أم V-TV ;
أمرت:أمرت V-IV ;
أس:أس V-IV ;
جوتلە:جوتلە V-TV ;
گوم:گوم V-TV ;
گور:گور V-TV ;
گوون:گوون V-IV ;
خبرلش:خبرلش V-IV ;
حالت:حالت V-TV ;
قینت:قینت V-TV ;
حیست:حیست V-TV ;
حوکمت:حوکمت V-IV ;
إچ:إج V-TV ;
أن:أن V-IV ;
دیشلە:دیشلە V-TV ;
إیت:إیت V-TV ;
قاخ:قاخ V-IV ;
قاپ:قاپ V-TV ;
قاور:قاور V-TV ;
قایر:قایر V-TV ;
چالن:چالن V-IV ;
قوالا:قوالا V-TV ;
گیر:گیر V-IV ;
إج:إچ V-TV ;
قاچ:قاچ V-IV ;
اوخوت:اوخوت V-TV ;
اوسور:اوسور V-IV ;
بکلە:بکلە V-TV ;
اختار:اختار V-TV ;
قیدت:قیدت V-TV ;
انلا:انلا V-TV ;
عایرلە:عایرلە V-TV ;
دیلیملە:دیلیملە V-TV ;
دولا:دولا V-TV;
دوزلە:دوزلە V-TV ;
قازغلا:قازغلا V-TV ;
کورلە:کورلە V-TV ;
لعنتلە:لعنتلە V-TV ;
نیتلە:نیتلە V-IV ;
ناصیحت% ات:ناصیحت% ات V-TV ;
إیت:إیت V-IV ;
دملە:دملە V-TV ;
درجلە:درجلە V-IV ;
دنگلە:دنگلە V-IV ;
أوزلە:أوزلە V-TV ;
پودرلا:پودرلا V-TV ;
سالا:سالا V-TV ;
سفرلە:سفرلە V-TV ;
سنە:سنە V-TV ;
سومور:سومور V-TV ;
سورکلە:سورکلە V-TV ;
تکملە% ات:تکملە% ات V-TV ;
ترسلە:ترسلە V-TV ;
یاغلاما:یاغلاما V-TV ;
یارلا:یارلا V-TV ;
یاشا:یاشا V-IV ;
یاخا:یاخا V-TV ;
یومرغلە:یومرغلە V-TV ;
اخسا:اخسا V-IV ;
ئدیل:ئدیل V-IV ;
بلیرت:بلییرت V-TV ;
پودرلا:پودرلا V-TV ;
